Utah statutes.
31A-23a-417.   Financial services insurance activities regulation.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the regulation of insurance activities of any person in this state be based on functional regulation principles established in the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, Pub. L. No. 106-102.

(2)  The insurance activities of any person in this state shall be functionally regulated by the commissioner subject to Sections 104, 301-308, 501-507, and 509 of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, Pub. L. No. 106-102.

(3)  Under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commissioner may adopt rules consistent with Section 104(d) of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, Pub. L. No. 106-102, and the functional regulation of insurance activities of any person otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner in this state described in Subsection (2).

(4)  The commissioner shall consult and coordinate with the commissioner of the Department of Financial Institutions and the director of the Division of Securities for the purpose of assuring, to the extent possible, that the rules prescribed by the department are consistent and comparable with federal regulations governing the insurance, banking, and securities industries.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

